Utah statutes.
16-10a-1202.   Sale of property requiring shareholder approval.
(1)  A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or
substantially all, of its property, with or without the good will, otherwise
than in the usual and regular course of business, on the terms and conditions
and for the consideration determined by the board of directors, if the board
of directors proposes and the shareholders approve the transaction.  A sale,
lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the
property of a corporation, with or without the good will, other than in the
usual and regular course of business and other than pursuant to a court order,
in connection with its dissolution is subject to the requirements of this
section, but a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or
substantially all, of the property of a corporation, with or without the good
will, that is pursuant to a court order is not subject to the requirements of
this section.
(2)  If a corporation is entitled to vote or otherwise consent, other than in
the usual and regular course of its business, with respect to the sale, lease,
exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property,
with or without the good will, of another entity which it controls, and if the
shares or other interests held by the corporation in the other entity
constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation, then
the corporation shall consent to the transaction only if the board of
directors proposes and the shareholders approve the consent.
(3)  For a transaction described in Subsection (1) or a consent described in
Subsection (2) to be authorized:
(a)  the board of directors must recommend the transaction or the consent to
the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of
conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no
recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the
shareholders with the submission of the proposed transaction; and
(b)  the shareholders entitled to vote on the transaction or the consent must
approve the transaction or the consent as provided in Subsections (5) and (6).
(4)  The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the transaction
or the consent on any basis.
(5)  The corporation shall give notice in accordance with Section 16-10a-705
to each shareholder entitled to vote on the transaction described in
Subsection (1) or the consent described in Subsection (2), of the
shareholders' meeting at which the transaction or the consent will be voted
upon.  The notice must:
(a)  state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to
consider:
(i)  in the case of action pursuant to Subsection (1), the sale, lease,
exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property
of the corporation; or
(ii)  in the case of action pursuant to Subsection (2), the corporation's
consent to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or
substantially all, of the property of another entity (which shall be
identified in the notice) the shares or other interests of which held by the
corporation constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the
corporation; and
(b)  contain or be accompanied by a description of the transaction, in the
case of action pursuant to Subsection (1), or by a description of the
transaction underlying the consent, in the case of action pursuant to
Subsection (2).
(6)  Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, the initial bylaws or
the bylaws as amended pursuant to Section 16-10a-1021, or the board of
directors acting pursuant to Subsection (4) requires a greater vote, the
transaction described in Subsection (1) or the consent described in Subsection
(2) must be approved by each voting group entitled to vote on the transaction
or the consent by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the
transaction or the consent by that voting group.
(7)  After a transaction described in Subsection (1) or a consent described in
Subsection (2) is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned or the consent
withheld or revoked by the corporation's board of directors subject to any
contractual rights or other limitation on the abandonment, withholding, or
revocation, without further shareholder action.
(8)  A transaction that constitutes a distribution is governed by Section
16-10a-640 and not by this section.
